Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,167
Notice of pending refund or state lottery prize.

If a debtor identified by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to section 77-27,165 or 77-27,166 is determined by the Department of Revenue to be entitled to a refund of twenty-five dollars or more or a state lottery prize, the Department of Health and Human Services shall be notified that a refund or prize is pending.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 74;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 804;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 205.